District of Columbia statutes.
22-2711

Procuring for third persons.

Any person who, within the District of Columbia, shall receive any money or other valuable thing for or on account of procuring and placing in the charge or custody of another person for sexual intercourse, prostitution, debauchery, or other immoral purposes any individual shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years and by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

History

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 7
as added Jan. 3, 1941, 54 Stat. 1226, ch. 936, § 4
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 13(b), 41 DCR 1639
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 229(e), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Sexual performances using minors, see § 22-3101 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2711.
1973 Ed., § 22-2711.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 229(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.